Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.070

Postponement, adjournment of sale—Notice.

The personal representative, should he or she deem it for the best interests of all concerned, may postpone such sale to a time fixed but not to exceed twenty days, and such postponement shall be made by proclamation of the personal representative at the time and place first appointed for the sale; if there be an adjournment of such sale for more than three days, then it shall be the duty of the personal representative to cause a notice of such adjournment to be published in a legal newspaper in the county in which notice was published as provided in RCW 11.56.060, in addition to making such proclamation.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2046; 1965 c 145 s 11.56.070. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 128; RRS s 1498; prior: Code 1881 s 1505; 1854 p 287 s 115.]